Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2512XS (1) 91 nls/ko S.F. 197 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.24A Prescription drugs ââ 1 metastatic cancer and associated conditions. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âAssociated conditionsâ means symptoms or side effects 5 associated with metastatic cancer, or with the health care 6 services for metastatic cancer provided by a covered personâs 7 health care professional and which in the judgment of the 8 covered personâs health professional jeopardizes the health of 9 the covered person. 10 b. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, or 11 other person participating in a policy, contract, or plan that 12 provides for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 13 medical expenses that provides coverage for prescription drugs. 14 c. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 15 section 514J.102. 16 d. âHealth care servicesâ means services for the diagnosis, 17 prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, 18 illness, injury, or disease. 19 e. âMetastatic cancerâ means cancer that has spread from 20 the primary or original site of the cancer to tissue, lymph 21 nodes, or other parts of the body. Metastatic cancer may also 22 be referred to as advanced cancer or stage 4 cancer. 23 f. âPrescription cancer drugâ means a prescription drug that 24 is used for the treatment of metastatic cancer or associated 25 conditions. 26 g. âPrescription drugâ means a prescription drug that has 27 been prescribed as medically necessary by a covered personâs 28 health care professional. 29 h. âStep therapy protocolâ means the same as defined in 30 section 514F.7. 31 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment 32 requirements of section 514C.6, a policy, contract, or plan 33 providing for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 34 medical expenses that provides coverage for prescription drugs 35 -1- LSB 2512XS (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 197 shall provide coverage for prescription cancer drugs. 1 b. Notwithstanding section 514F.7, the policy, contract, or 2 plan shall provide coverage, without imposing a step therapy 3 protocol, for a prescription cancer drug that meets all of the 4 following requirements: 5 (1) The use of the prescription cancer drug is in accordance 6 with the medical standards of care for metastatic cancer or 7 associated conditions. 8 (2) The use of the prescription cancer drug for metastatic 9 cancer and associated conditions is supported by peer-reviewed, 10 evidence-based literature. 11 (3) The prescription cancer drug has been approved by the 12 United States food and drug administration. 13 3. a. This section applies to the following classes of 14 third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 15 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 16 state on or after January 1, 2026: 17 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 18 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 19 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 20 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 21 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 22 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 23 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 24 chapter 509A. 25 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified 26 disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital confinement 27 indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, 28 long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical expense 29 coverage as defined by the commissioner of insurance, 30 disability income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a 31 supplement to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or 32 similar insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 33 4. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 34 chapter 17A to administer this section. 35 -2- LSB 2512XS (1) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 197